Washington statutes.
RCW 19.225.090

Required records—Retention.

(1) An athlete agent shall create and retain for five years records of the following:

(a) The name and address of each individual represented by the athlete agent;

(b) Each agency contract entered into by the athlete agent; and

(c) The direct costs incurred by the athlete agent in the recruitment or solicitation of each student athlete to enter into an agency contract.

(2) Records described in subsection (1) of this section are subject to subpoena in a judicial proceeding.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 13 s 9; 2002 c 131 s 10.]